Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-565
Interference with person hunting, trapping, or fishing; injunction.

A court may enjoin conduct described in section 37-564 upon petition by a person affected or by a person who may reasonably be affected by such conduct upon a showing that such conduct is threatened or that it has occurred on a particular premises in the past and that it is not unreasonable to expect such conduct will be repeated.

Laws 1995, LB 274, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-529.02;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 285.